apertium-swa.swa.lexd
#!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
#!!                                                                         !!!
#!!                   S W A H I L I   T R A N S D U C E R                   !!!
#!!                                                                         !!!
#!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

#=============================================================================!
#                         Noun Morphotactics                                  !
#=============================================================================!

PATTERNS
:I-II I-II-Stems I-II:
:I-Irr I-Irr-Stems I-Irr:
:III-IV III-IV-Stems III-IV:
:V-VI V-VI-Stems V-VI:
:VII-VIII VII-VIII-Stems VII-VIII:
:IX-X IX-X-Stems IX-X:
:XI XI-Stems XI:
:XIV  XIV-Stems XIV:
#XV
#XVI 
#XVII 
#XVIII 

LEXICON I-II
<n><cl1><sg>:m
<n><cl1><pl>:wa

LEXICON I-Irr
<n><cl1><sp>:

LEXICON III-IV
<n><cl3><sg>:m
<n><cl3><pl>:mi

LEXICON V-VI
#<n><cl5><sg>:
<n><cl5><sg>:
<n><cl5><pl>:ma

LEXICON VII-VIII
<n><cl7><sg>:ki
<n><cl7><pl>:vi

LEXICON IX-X
# TODO: prefix before vowel(ny)
<n><cl9><sp>:

LEXICON XI
<n><cl11><sg>:

LEXICON XIV
<n><cl14><sg>:

#LEXICON XIV
#<n><cl15><sg>:

#LEXICON XIV
#<n><cl16><sg>:

#LEXICON XIV
#<n><cl17><sg>:

#LEXICON XIV
#<n><cl18><sg>:

#!=============================================================================!
#!                         Pronoun Morphotactics                               !
#!=============================================================================!

PATTERNS
Prn-Mimi | Prn-Sisi | Prn-Wewe | Prn-Nyinyi | Prn-Yeye | Prn-Wao

LEXICON Prn-Mimi
<prn><pers><p1><sg>:mimi

LEXICON Prn-Sisi
<prn><pers><p1><pl>:sisi

LEXICON Prn-Wewe
<prn><pers><p2><sg>:wewe

LEXICON Prn-Nyinyi
<prn><pers><p2><pl>:nyinyi

LEXICON Prn-Yeye
<prn><pers><p3><sg>:yeye

LEXICON Prn-Wao
<prn><pers><p3><pl>:wao

#=============================================================================!
#                         Verb Morphotactics                                  !
#=============================================================================!

PATTERNS
# subject concord always present
# except in infitive, habitual, imperative
#TODO: more subsections

:VInfImpHab(1) V-Stems V-Suffix  VInfImpHab(2)

:VerbPersNum(1) :V-TAM(1) V-Stems V-Suffix V-TAM(1): VerbPersNum(1): V-Ext
:VerbPersNum(2) :V-TAM(2) V-Stems V-Suffix V-TAM(2): VerbPersNum(2): V-Ext

:VClassNum(1) :V-TAM(1) V-Stems V-Suffix V-TAM(1): VClassNum(1): V-Ext
:VClassNum(2) :V-TAM(2) V-Stems V-Suffix V-TAM(2): VClassNum(2): V-Ext

:VClassNum(1) V-Stems V-Suffix [<subj>:>] VClassNum(1): [:e]
:VerbPersNum(1) V-Stems V-Suffix [<subj>:>] VerbPersNum(1): [:e]

:VerbPersNum(1) [:si>] V-Stems V-Suffix [<subj><neg>:>] VerbPersNum(1): [:e]
:VClassNum(1) [:si>] V-Stems V-Suffix [<subj><neg>:>] VClassNum(1): [:e]

#Kuwa/Irr
V-Wa-Irr
V-Wa-Irr2 V-Rel-Suff
#:VerbPersNum V-Wa-Rel-Prs V-Rel-Suff :VerbPersNum
:VerbPersNum(1) V-Wa-Loc-Prn(1) | V-Wa-Loc-Prn(2) | V-Wa-Loc-Prn(3) V-Wa-Loc-Prn(4): VerbPersNum(1):
:VerbPersNum(2) V-Wa-Loc-Prn(1) | V-Wa-Loc-Prn(2) | V-Wa-Loc-Prn(3) V-Wa-Loc-Prn(4): VerbPersNum(2):

:VClassNum(1) V-Wa-Loc-N(1) | V-Wa-Loc-N(2) | V-Wa-Loc-N(3) V-Wa-Loc-N(4): VClassNum(1):
:VClassNum(2) V-Wa-Loc-N(1) | V-Wa-Loc-N(2) | V-Wa-Loc-N(3) V-Wa-Loc-N(4): VClassNum(2):

LEXICON VerbPersNum(2)
<p1><sg>:ni  <p1><sg><neg>:si
<p2><sg>:u   <p2><sg><neg>:hu 
<p3><sg>:a   <p3><sg><neg>:ha
<p1><pl>:tu  <p1><pl><neg>:hatu
<p2><pl>:m   <p3><pl><neg>:ham
<p3><pl>:wa  <p3><pl><neg>:hawa

LEXICON VClassNum(2)
<cl1><sg>:a    <cl1><sg>:ha
<cl1><pl>:wa   <cl1><pl>:hawa
<cl3><sg>:u    <cl3><sg>:hau
<cl3><pl>:i    <cl3><pl>:hai
<cl5><sg>:li   <cl5><sg>:hali
<cl5><pl>:ya   <cl5><pl>:haya
<cl7><sg>:ki   <cl7><sg>:haki
<cl7><pl>:vi   <cl7><pl>:havi
<cl9><sg>:i    <cl9><sg>:hai
<cl9><pl>:zi   <cl9><pl>:hazi
<cl11><sg>:u   <cl11><sg>:hau
<cl14><sg>:u   <cl14><sg>:hau

#<cl15><sg>:ku <cl15><sg>:haku
#<cl16><sg>:pa <cl16><sg>:hapa
#<cl17><sg>:ku <cl17><sg>:haku
#<cl18><sg>:m  <cl18><sg>:ham


LEXICON V-TAM(2)
<prs>:na   <prs><neg>:
<past>:li  <past><neg>:ku
<fut>:ta   <fut><neg>:ta # and to
<perf>:me  <perf><neg>:ja

#<prsi>:a # present indefinite
#<sit>:ki # situational,conditional
#<cons>:ka # consecutive
#<irrpr>:nge <irrpr><neg>:nge> # irrealis present/neg 2
#<irrprn>:singe # irrealis present neg 1
#<irrps>:ngali <irrps><neg>:ngali> # irrealis past
#<irrps>:singali # irrealis past neg 1

LEXICON V-Obj
:mw # can also be mw
:wa
:ku
:wa
:ni
:tu
:

LEXICON V-Suffix
<vblex>:

LEXICON V-Ext
:a

LEXICON VInfImpHab(2)
: <imp><sg>:a
: <imp><pl>:eni

:ku <inf><cl15>:a
:kuto <inf><neg><cl15>:a
:kutoku <inf><neg><cl15>:a

:hu <hab>:a

LEXICON V-Rel-Suff
#relative morpheme
#only happens in prs,past,fut,t. neg, t.pos
#TODO: remove class and genre reference
<cl1><sg>:ye
<cl1><pl>:o
<cl3><sg>:o
<cl3><pl>:yo
<cl5><sg>:lo
<cl5><pl>:yo
<cl7><sg>:cho
<cl7><pl>:vyo
<cl9><sg>:yo
<cl9><pl>:zo
<cl11><sg>:o
<cl14><sg>:o
<cl15><sg>:ko
<cl16><sg>:po
<cl17><sg>:ko
<cl18><sg>:mo

LEXICON V-Wa-Irr
#invariable copula
kuwa<vbser><prs>:ni
kuwa<vbser><prs><neg>:si

LEXICON V-Wa-Irr2
#focus/emphatic copula
#emphasizing subj/noun
#'it is (not) I'
kuwa<vbser><foc>:ndi
kuwa<vbser><foc><neg>:si

LEXICON V-Wa-Loc-N(4)
#locatives with n
#TODO: add classes
kuwa:po kuwa:ko kuwa:mo <vbser><loc>:

LEXICON V-Wa-Loc-Prn(4)
#locatives with prn
kuwa:po kuwa:ko kuwa:mo <vbser><loc>:

LEXICON V-Wa-Rel-Prs
#relative form of to be
#only happens in the prs
kuwa<vbser><rel><prs>:li
kuwa<vbser><rel><prs>:si

#=============================================================================!
#                     Determiners/Adjective Morphotactics                     !
#=============================================================================!

PATTERNS
Dem(1) | Dem(2) | Dem(3) Dem(4): | Dem(5):
Det(1) | Det(2) Det(3):

LEXICON Dem(5)
huyu  yule  huyo   <prn><dem><cl1><sg>: <adj><dem><cl1><sg>:
hawa  wale 	hao    <prn><dem><cl1><pl>: <adj><dem><cl1><pl>:
huu 	ule 	huo    <prn><dem><cl3><sg>: <adj><dem><cl3><sg>:
hii 	ile 	hiyo   <prn><dem><cl3><pl>: <adj><dem><cl3><pl>:
hili 	lile 	hilo	 <prn><dem><cl5><sg>: <adj><dem><cl5><sg>:
haya 	yale 	hayo 	 <prn><dem><cl5><pl>: <adj><dem><cl5><pl>:
hiki 	kile 	hicho  <prn><dem><cl7><sg>: <adj><dem><cl7><sg>:
hivi 	vile 	hivyo  <prn><dem><cl7><pl>: <adj><dem><cl7><pl>:
hii 	ile 	hiyo 	 <prn><dem><cl9><sg>: <adj><dem><cl9><sg>:
hizi 	zile 	hizo 	 <prn><dem><cl9><pl>: <adj><dem><cl9><pl>:
huu 	ule 	huo 	 <prn><dem><cl11><sg>: <adj><dem><cl11><sg>:
huu 	ule 	huo  	 <prn><dem><cl14><sg>: <adj><dem><cl14><sg>:
huku 	kule 	huko 	 <prn><dem><cl15><sg>: <adj><dem><cl15><sg>:
hapa 	pale 	hapo   <prn><dem><cl16><sg>: <adj><dem><cl16><sg>: 
huku 	kule 	huko 	 <prn><dem><cl17><sg>: <adj><dem><cl17><sg>:
humu 	mle 	humo 	 <prn><dem><cl18><sg>: <adj><dem><cl18><sg>:

LEXICON Det(3)
wote 	wowote <det><cl1><pl>:
wote 	wowote <det><cl3><sg>:	
yote 	yoyote 	<det><cl3><pl>:
lote 	lolote 	<det><cl5><sg>:
yote 	yoyote 	<det><cl5><pl>:
chote 	chochote 	<det><cl7><sg>:
vyote 	vyovyote 	<det><cl7><pl>:
yote 	yoyote 	<det><cl9><sg>:
zote 	zozote 	<det><cl9><pl>:
wote 	wowote 	<det><cl11><sg>:
wote 	wowote 	<det><cl14><sg>:
kote kokote <det><cl15><sg>:
kwote kwokwote 	<det><cl15><sg>:
pote 	popote 	<det><cl16><sg>:
kote 	kokote <det><cl17><sg>:
kwote kwokwote 	<det><cl17><sg>:
mote momote <det><cl18><sg>:
mwote mwomwote 	<det><cl18><sg>:

PATTERNS
Adj-Inv [<adj>:]
:Adj-Suff Adj-Var [<adj>:] Adj-Suff:

LEXICON Adj-Suff
<cl1><sg>:m
<cl1><pl>:wa
<cl3><sg>:m
<cl3><pl>:mi
<cl5><sg>:ji # only appears for 1 adj
<cl5><pl>:ma
<cl7><sg>:ki
<cl7><pl>:vi
<cl9><sg>:n # fix after coverage testing
<cl9><pl>:n # fix after coverage testing
<cl11><sg>:u
<cl14><sg>:m
<cl15><sg>:ku
<cl16><sg>:pa
<cl17><sg>:ku
<cl18><sg>:mu


#!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
#!!!                          L E X I C O N                                  !!!
#!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!


#=============================================================================!
#                               Nouns                                         !
#=============================================================================!


LEXICON I-II-Stems
mtu:tu # "Person"
mtoto:toto  # "Child"
mkulima:kulima  # "Farmer"
mke:ke  # "Wife"
msichana:sichana  # "Girl"
mvulana:vulana  # "Boy"
mgeni:geni  # "Visitor"
mfaransa:faransa  # "French person"
mjomba:jomba  # "Uncle"
mpishi:pishi  # "Cook"
mzee:zee  # "Elder"
mzungu:zungu  # "White man"
mjerumani:jerumani  # "German"
mnyama:nyama  # "Animal"
msusi:susi # "hairdresser"

LEXICON I-Irr-Stems
baba:baba # "Father"
mama:mama # "Mother"
dada:dada # "Sister"
kaka:kaka # "Brother"
nyanya:nyanya # "Grandmother"
rafiki:rafiki # "Friend"
shangazi:shangazi # "Aunt" 
kipofu:kipofu # "Blind(person)"
kiziwi:kiziwi # "Deaf(person)"
mbwa:mbwa # "Dog"
paka:paka # "Cat"
